Utah statutes.
49-13-405.   Death of married members -- Service retirement benefits to surviving spouse.

(1)  As used in this section, "member's full allowance" means an Option Three allowance calculated under Section 49-13-402 without an actuarial reduction.

(2)  Upon the request of a deceased member's lawful spouse at the time of the member's death, the deceased member is considered to have retired under Option Three on the first day of the month following the month in which the member died if the following requirements are met:

(a)  the member has:

(i)  15 or more years of service credit;

(ii)  attained age 62 with 10 or more years of service credit; or

(iii)  attained age 65 with four or more years of service credit; and

(b)  the member dies leaving a spouse to whom the member has been married at least six months immediately prior to the death date.

(3)  The spouse who requests a benefit under this section shall apply in writing to the office.  The allowance shall begin on the first day of the month:

(a)  following the month in which the member died, if the application is received by the office within 90 days of the member's death; or

(b)  following the month in which the application is received by the office, if the application is received by the office more than 90 days after the spouse's death.

(4)  The allowance payable to a surviving spouse under Subsection (2) is:

(a)  if the member has 25 or more years of service credit at the time of death, the surviving spouse shall receive the member’s full allowance;

(b)  if the member has between 20-24 years of service credit and is not age 60 or older at the time of death, the surviving spouse shall receive two-thirds of the member’s full allowance;

(c)  if the member has between 15-19 years of service credit and is not age 62 or older at the time of death, the surviving spouse shall receive one-third of the member’s full allowance; or

(d)  if the member is age 60 or older with 20 or more years of service credit, age 62 or older with 10 or more years of service credit, or age 65 or older with four or more years of service credit at the time of death, the surviving spouse shall receive an Option Three benefit with actuarial reductions.

(5)  Except for a return of member contributions, benefits payable under this section are retirement benefits and shall be paid in addition to any other payments made under Section 49-13-501 and shall constitute a full and final settlement of the claim of the spouse or any other beneficiary filing a claim for benefits under Section 49-13-501.



Amended by Chapter 439, 2011 General Session

